Utah statutes.
48-2a-901.   Law governing.

Subject to the Constitution of this state:

(1)  the laws of the state under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its limited partners; and

(2)  a foreign limited partnership may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

